Utah statutes.
41-3-107.   Attorney general -- Duty to render opinions and to represent or appear for administrator or board.

The attorney general shall:

(1)  represent the administrator, the division, and the board;

(2)  give opinions on all questions of law relating to the interpretation of this chapter or arising out of the administration of this chapter; and

(3)  appear on behalf of the administrator, the division, or the board in all actions brought by or against the administrator, the division, or board, whether under the provisions of this chapter or otherwise.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1992 General Session

